New Jersey, session 221, S4662.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 18 of P.L.1982, c.77 (C.2A:4A-37) is amended to read as follows: 18.  Place of detention or shelter. a. The Youth Justice Commission established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1995, c.284 (C.52:17B-170) shall specify the place where a juvenile may be detained; and the Department of Children and Families shall specify where a juvenile may be placed in shelter. b.    [No] Except as set forth in subsection d. of this section, no juvenile shall be placed in detention or shelter care in any place other than that specified by the Youth Justice Commission or Department of Children and Families as provided in subsection a. c.     [A] Except as set forth in subsection d. of this section, a juvenile being held for a charge under this act or for a violation of or contempt in connection with a violation of Title 39 of the Revised Statutes, chapter 7 of Title 12 of the Revised Statutes or N.J.S.2C:33-13, including a juvenile who has reached the age of 18 years after being charged, shall not be placed in any prison, jail or lockup nor detained in any police station, except that if no other facility is reasonably available a juvenile may be held in a police station in a place other than one designed for the detention of prisoners and apart from any adult charged with or convicted of a crime for a brief period if such holding is necessary to allow release to his parent, guardian, other suitable person, or approved facility.  No juvenile shall be placed in a detention facility which has reached its maximum population capacity, as designated by the Youth Justice Commission. d.    No juvenile charged with delinquency shall be transferred to an adult county jail solely by reason of having reached age 18.  The following standards shall apply to any juvenile who has been placed on probation pursuant to section 24 of P.L.1982, c.77 (C.2A:4A-43) and who violates the conditions of that probation after reaching the age of 18[; who has been placed on parole pursuant to the provisions of the "Parole Act of 1979," P.L.1979, c.441 (C.30:4-123.45 et seq.) and who violates the conditions of that parole after reaching the age of 18;] or who is arrested after reaching the age of 18 on a warrant emanating from the commission of an act of juvenile delinquency: (1)   In the case of a person 18 years of age but less than 20 years of age, the court[, upon application by any interested party, shall determine the place of detention, taking into consideration the age and maturity of the person, whether the placement of the person in a juvenile detention facility would present a risk to the safety of juveniles residing at the facility, the likelihood that the person would influence in a negative manner juveniles incarcerated at the facility, whether the facility has sufficient space available for juveniles and any other factor the court deems appropriate] shall hold a hearing to determine whether it is in the interest of justice to detain the person in a county juvenile detention facility, an adult county jail, or a secure facility operated by the Youth Justice Commission.  Upon application at any time by the juvenile detention facility administrator or any other interested party, the court may order that the person be relocated to the county jail.  The denial of an application shall not preclude subsequent applications based on a change in circumstances or information that was not previously made available to the court.  The determination of the place of detention shall be made in a summary manner; and (2)   In the case of a person 20 years of age or older, the person shall be incarcerated in the county jail unless good cause is shown. (3)   When a juvenile who is detained in a county juvenile detention facility reaches the age of 18, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether it is in the interest of justice to continue to detain the person in the county juvenile detention facility or transfer the person to an adult county jail or a secure facility operated by the Youth Justice Commission. (4)   At the hearing required pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (3) of this subsection, the court shall determine the place of detention, taking into consideration the following factors: (a)   the physical and mental danger the person presents to other juveniles; (b)   known gang affiliations of the person; (c)   the nature of the alleged crimes committed by the person; (d)   the history of prior delinquent acts committed by the person; (e)   the physical and mental maturity of the person; (f)   when the person presents any imminent risk of self-harm; and (g)   any other aggravating or mitigating factors the court deems appropriate. (5)   Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, a juvenile may be detained in a secure facility operated by the Youth Justice Commission pursuant to the provisions of this subsection. e.     (1) The Youth Justice Commission and the Department of Children and Families shall promulgate such rules and regulations from time to time as deemed necessary to establish minimum physical facility and program standards for juvenile detention facilities or shelters under their respective supervision. (2)   The Youth Justice Commission and the Department of   Children and Families, in consultation with the appropriate county administrator of the county facility or shelter, shall assign a maximum population capacity for each juvenile detention facility or shelter based on minimum standards for these facilities. f.     (1) Where either the Youth Justice Commission or the Department of Children and Families determines that a juvenile detention facility or shelter under its control or authority is regularly over the maximum population capacity or is in willful and continuous disregard of the minimum standards for these facilities or shelters, the commission or department may restrict new admissions to the facility or shelter. (2)   Upon making such determination, the commission or department shall notify the governing body of the appropriate county of its decision to impose such a restriction, which notification shall include a written statement specifying the reasons therefor and corrections to be made. If the commission or department shall determine that no appropriate action has been initiated by the administrator of the facility or shelter within 60 days following such notification to correct the violations specified in the notification, it shall order that such juvenile detention facility or shelter shall immediately cease to admit juveniles.  The county shall be entitled to a hearing where such a restriction is imposed by the commission or department. (3)   Any juvenile detention facility or shelter so restricted shall continue under such order until such time as the commission or department determines that the violation specified in the notice has been corrected or that the facility or shelter has initiated actions which will ensure the correction of said violations. (4)   Upon the issuance of an order to cease admissions to a juvenile detention facility or shelter, the commission or department shall determine whether other juvenile detention facilities or shelters have adequate room for admitting juveniles and shall assign the juveniles to the facilities or shelters on the basis of available space; provided that the department shall not assign the juvenile to a facility or shelter where such facility or shelter is at the maximum population.  A juvenile detention facility or shelter ordered to accept a juvenile shall do so within five days following the receipt of an order to accept admission of such juvenile. (5)   A juvenile detention facility or shelter restricted by an order to cease admissions shall assume responsibility for the transportation of a juvenile sent to another juvenile detention facility or shelter so long as the order shall remain in effect. (6)   A facility or shelter receiving juveniles pursuant to paragraph (4) of this subsection shall receive from the sending county a reasonable and appropriate per diem allowance for each juvenile sent to the facility, such allowance to be used for the custody, care, maintenance, and any other services normally provided by the county to juveniles in the facility or shelter and which reflects all county expenditures in maintaining such juvenile, including a proportionate share of all buildings and grounds costs, personnel costs, including fringe benefits, administrative costs and all other direct and indirect costs. (7)   The governing body of a county whose juvenile detention facility or shelter has been prohibited from accepting new admissions, and whose juveniles have been assigned to other juvenile detention facilities or shelters, shall appropriate an amount to pay the county receiving such juveniles for all expenses incurred pursuant to paragraph (6) of this subsection. (cf:  P.L.2025, c.35, s.4) 2.    Section 1 of P.L.2015, c.89 (C.2A:4A-26.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a. A prosecutor seeking waiver of jurisdiction of a juvenile delinquency case by the Superior Court, Chancery Division, Family Part to an appropriate court and prosecuting authority without the consent of the juvenile shall file a motion within 60 days after the receipt of the complaint, which time may be extended for good cause shown.  The motion shall be accompanied by a written statement of reasons clearly setting forth the facts used in assessing all factors contained in paragraph (3) of subsection c. of this section, together with an explanation as to how evaluation of those facts support waiver for each particular juvenile.  A juvenile who is detained pursuant to section 18 of P.L.1982, c.77 (C.2A:4A-37) for the period of time prior to the filing of the motion by the prosecutor shall be credited with time served following a final disposition resulting in detention. b.    At a hearing, the court shall receive the evidence offered by the State and by the juvenile.  The State shall provide proof to satisfy the requirements set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection c. of this section. The court also shall review whether the State considered the factors set forth in paragraph (3) of subsection c. of this section. c.     Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the court shall waive jurisdiction of a juvenile delinquency case without the juvenile's consent and shall refer the case to the appropriate court and prosecuting authority having jurisdiction if: (1)   The juvenile was 15 years of age or older at the time of the alleged delinquent act; and (2)   There is probable cause to believe that the juvenile committed a delinquent act which if committed by an adult would constitute: (a)   criminal homicide, other than death by auto; (b)   strict liability for drug-induced deaths; (c)   first degree robbery; (d)   carjacking; (e)   aggravated sexual assault; (f)   sexual assault; (g)   second degree aggravated assault; (h)   kidnapping; (i)    aggravated arson; (j)    possession of a firearm with a purpose to use it unlawfully against the person of another under subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:39-4, or possession of a firearm while committing or attempting to commit, including the immediate flight therefrom, aggravated assault, aggravated criminal sexual contact, burglary, home invasion burglary, residential burglary, or escape; (k)   a violation of N.J.S.2C:35-3 (Leader of a Narcotics Trafficking Network); (l)    a violation of N.J.S.2C:35-4 (Maintaining and Operating a CDS Production Facility); (m)  a violation of section 1 of P.L.1998, c.26 (C.2C:39-4.1) (Weapons Possession while Committing certain CDS Offenses); (n)   an attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the crimes enumerated in subparagraphs (a) through (m) of this paragraph; or (o)   a crime committed at a time when the juvenile previously had been sentenced and confined in an adult correctional facility. (3)   The court may deny a motion by the prosecutor to waive jurisdiction of a juvenile delinquency case if it is clearly convinced that the prosecutor abused his discretion in considering the following factors in deciding whether to seek a waiver: (a)   The nature and circumstances of the offense charged; (b)   Whether the offense was against a person or property, allocating more weight for crimes against the person; (c)   Degree of the juvenile's culpability; (d)   Age and maturity of the juvenile; (e)   Any classification that the juvenile is eligible for special education to the extent this information is provided to the prosecution by the juvenile or by the court; (f)   Degree of criminal sophistication exhibited by the juvenile; (g)   Nature and extent of any prior history of delinquency of the juvenile and dispositions imposed for those adjudications; (h)   If the juvenile previously served a custodial disposition in a State juvenile facility operated by the Youth Justice Commission, and the response of the juvenile to the programs provided at the facility to the extent this information is provided to the prosecution by the Youth Justice Commission; (i)    Current or prior involvement of the juvenile with child welfare agencies; (j)    Evidence of mental health concerns, substance use disorder, or emotional instability of the juvenile to the extent this information is provided to the prosecution by the juvenile or by the court; and (k)   If there is an identifiable victim, the input of the victim or victim's family. The Attorney General may develop for dissemination to the county prosecutors those guidelines or directives deemed necessary or appropriate to ensure the uniform application of this section throughout the State. d.    An order waiving jurisdiction over a case and referring the case to the appropriate court and prosecuting authority shall specify the alleged act upon which the referral is based and all other delinquent acts charged against the juvenile arising out of or related to the same transaction. e.     Testimony of a juvenile at a hearing to determine referral under this section shall not be admissible for any purpose in any subsequent hearing to determine delinquency or guilt of any offense. f.     Upon waiver of jurisdiction and referral to the appropriate court and prosecuting authority having jurisdiction: (1)   The case shall proceed as if it originated in that court and shall be subject to the sentencing provisions available to that court; provided, however, upon conviction for any offense which is subject to waiver pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection c. of this section, there shall be a presumption that the juvenile shall serve any custodial sentence imposed in a State juvenile facility operated by the Youth Justice Commission until the juvenile reaches the age of 21, except that: (a)   a juvenile who has not reached the age of 21 may, in the discretion of the Youth Justice Commission, be transferred to the Department of Corrections in accordance with the plan established pursuant to subsection e. of section 7 of P.L.1995, c.284 (C.52:17B-175) and regulations adopted pursuant to that section; and (b)   a juvenile who has reached or exceeds the age of 21 may continue to serve a sentence in a State juvenile facility operated by the Youth Justice Commission in the discretion of the Youth Justice Commission and if the juvenile so consents; otherwise the juvenile shall serve the remainder of the custodial sentence in a State correctional facility; (2)   If a juvenile is not convicted of an offense set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection c. of this section, a conviction for any other offense shall be deemed a juvenile adjudication and be remanded to the Superior Court, Chancery Division, Family Part for disposition, in accordance with the dispositional options available to that court and all records related to the act of delinquency shall be subject to the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1982, c.79 (C.2A:4A-60); (3)   With the consent of the defense and the prosecutor, at any point in the proceedings subsequent to the decision ordering waiver the court may remand to the Superior Court, Chancery Division, Family Part if it appears that: (a)   the interests of the public and the best interests of the juvenile require access to programs or procedures uniquely available to that court; and (b)   the interests of the public are no longer served by waiver. g. (1) The Youth Justice Commission, in consultation with the Attorney General, shall establish a program to collect, record, and analyze data regarding waiver of jurisdiction of a juvenile delinquency case by the Superior Court, Chancery Division, Family Part to an appropriate court and prosecuting authority.  In furtherance of this program, the Youth Justice Commission shall, in cooperation with the Administrative Office of the Courts, Attorney General, and county prosecutors, collect data related to the decision to seek waiver of jurisdiction of a juvenile delinquency case, which shall include but not be limited to data concerning: (a)   youth demographics, including age, gender, race, and ethnicity; (b)   case characteristics, including the degree of the offense waived, the degree of the offense convicted, and the final court resolution; (c)   case processing times; and (d)   waiver rates by race and ethnicity. (2)   The commission shall prepare and publish on its Internet website biennial reports summarizing the data collected, recorded, and analyzed pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection. (3)   The commission shall, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), biennially prepare and transmit to the Governor and the Legislature the reports required in paragraph (2) of this subsection, along with any recommendations the commission may have for legislation concerning waiver of jurisdiction of juvenile delinquency cases. (cf: P.L.2025, c.35, s.3) 3.    Section 15 of P.L.1982,c.77 (C.2A:4A-34) is amended to read as follows: 15.  Criteria for placing juvenile in detention. a.     Except as otherwise provided in this section, a juvenile charged with an act of delinquency shall be released pending the disposition of a case, if any, to any person or agency provided for in this section upon assurance being received that such person or persons accept responsibility for the juvenile and will bring him before the court as ordered. b.    No juvenile shall be placed in detention without the permission of a judge or the court intake service. c.     A juvenile charged with delinquency may not be placed or retained in detention under this act prior to disposition, except as otherwise provided by law, unless: (1)   Detention is necessary to secure the presence of the juvenile at the next hearing as evidenced by a demonstrable record of recent willful failure to appear at juvenile court proceedings or to remain where placed by the court or the court intake service or the juvenile is subject to a current warrant for failure to appear at court proceedings which is active at the time of arrest; or (2)   The physical safety of persons or property of the community would be seriously threatened if the juvenile were not detained and the juvenile is charged with an offense which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a crime of the first, second or third degree or one of the following crimes of the fourth degree:  aggravated assault; stalking; criminal sexual contact; bias intimidation; failure to control or report a dangerous fire; possession of a prohibited weapon or device in violation of N.J.S.2C:39-3; or unlawful possession of a weapon in violation of N.J.S.2C:39-5; or (3)   With respect to a juvenile charged with an offense which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a crime of the fourth degree other than those enumerated in paragraph (2) of this subsection, or a disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offense, and with respect to a juvenile charged with an offense enumerated in subsection c. when the criteria for detention are not met, the juvenile may be temporarily placed in a shelter or other non-secure placement if a parent or guardian cannot be located or will not accept custody of the juvenile.  Police and court intake personnel shall make all reasonable efforts to locate a parent or guardian to accept custody of the juvenile prior to requesting or approving the juvenile's placement in a shelter or other non-secure placement.  If, after the initial detention hearing, continued placement is necessary, the juvenile shall be returned to a shelter or other non-secure placement. d.    The judge or court intake officer prior to making a decision of detention shall consider and, where appropriate, employ any of the following alternatives: (1)   Release to parents; (2)   Release on juvenile's promise to appear at next hearing; (3)   Release to parents, guardian or custodian upon written assurance to secure the juvenile's presence at the next hearing; (4)   Release into care of a custodian or public or private agency reasonably capable of assisting the juvenile to appear at the next hearing; (5)   Release with imposition of restrictions on activities, associations, movements and residence reasonably related to securing the appearance of the juvenile at the next hearing; (6)   Release with required participation in a home detention program; (7)   Placement in a shelter care facility; or (8)   Imposition of any other restrictions other than detention or shelter care reasonably related to securing the appearance of the juvenile. e.     In determining whether detention is appropriate for the juvenile, the following factors shall be considered: (1)   The nature and circumstances of the offense charged; (2)   The age of the juvenile; (3)   The juvenile's ties to the community; (4)   The juvenile's record of prior adjudications, if any; and (5)   The juvenile's record of appearance or nonappearance at previous court proceedings. f.     No juvenile 11 years of age or under shall be placed in detention unless he is charged with an offense which, if committed by an adult, would be a crime of the first or second degree or arson. g.    If the court places a juvenile in detention, the court shall state on the record its reasons for that detention. h.    For purposes of this section, a failure to appear at juvenile court proceedings or to remain where placed by the court or the court intake service shall be deemed recent if it occurred within the 12 months immediately preceding the detention hearing, or if it occurred within the period of 12 to 24 months preceding the detention hearing and the juvenile is unable to demonstrate a record of voluntary compliance with any subsequent court appearance and placement requirements. i.  A trial of final disposition of a juvenile pursuant to this title shall take place no later than two years following the intake of that juvenile pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1982, c.77 (C.2A:4A-31), excluding any delays attributable to the juvenile. (cf: P.L.2005, c.361, s.1) 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.